West Virginia, session 2025, SB37.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 4. SALARIES, WAGES, AND OTHER BENEFITS. §18A-4-10a. Bonus for unused days of personal leave. (a) County boards of education are authorized to may pay to their employees or to defined groups thereof, for the purpose of reducing absenteeism, a bonus at the end of an employment term for each unused day of personal leave accumulated by the employee during that employment term.(b) To further incentivize attendance, any classroom teacher who first became a member of the Teachers Retirement System as provided in §18-7A-1 et seq. of this code on or after July 1, 2015, may sell up to 10 of his or her unused days of personal leave back to the county board at the end of the school year in exchange for a cash on-time salary enhancement equal to 80 percent, per day, of the pay rate used by the county board to compensate substitute teachers having a bachelor's degree and 10 years of experience and substitute teaching for a single day pursuant to §18A-4-7 of this code. The one-time salary enhancement shall be paid on or before June 30: Provided, That any classroom teacher who sells his or her unused days of personal leave forfeits those days, and the days shall no longer be available to the classroom teacher for any purpose. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home